Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8881. MESA UNDERGROUND WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8881.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Mesa Underground Water Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district in Dawson County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district includes the territory located in Dawson County, unless the district's territory has been modified under:

(1) Section 8881.103 of this chapter or its predecessor statute, former Section 11(c), Chapter 669, Acts of the 71st Legislature, Regular Session, 1989; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8881.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five elected directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. One director is elected from each county commissioners precinct in Dawson County and one director is elected from the district at large.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.053. ELECTION DATE. The district shall hold an election to elect the appropriate number of directors on the uniform election date in May of each even-numbered year or another date authorized by law.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. (a) A director must be 18 years of age or older.

(b) To represent a county commissioners precinct, the director must be a resident of that precinct.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8881.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has all of the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.102. CONTRACT AUTHORITY OF DISTRICT. (a) The district may contract for, sell, and distribute water from a water import authority or other agency.

(b) The district may contract with other districts that have powers similar to those of the district to achieve common goals.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8881.103. ANNEXATION OF TERRITORY. (a) Territory may be added to the district under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(2) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code.

(b) If the district annexes territory, the board shall determine the precincts to which annexed territory is added for the purpose of electing directors.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.